Illinois, session 104th, SB783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4, 6, 10, 11, 11.1, 12, and 13 and by adding 6Section 11.5 as follows: 7    (415 ILCS 60/4)  (from Ch. 5, par. 804)8    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    1. "Director" means Director of the Illinois Department of 10Agriculture or his authorized representative.11    2. "Active Ingredient" means any ingredient which will 12prevent, destroy, repel, control or mitigate a pest or which 13will act as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.14    3. "Adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if the 15strength or purity is not within the standard of quality 16expressed on the labeling under which it is sold, distributed 17or used, including any substance which has been substituted 18wholly or in part for the pesticide as specified on the 19labeling under which it is sold, distributed or used, or if any 20valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in 21part abstracted.22    4. "Agricultural Commodity" means produce of the land, 23including, but not limited to, plants and plant parts,   SB0783 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1livestock and poultry and livestock or poultry products, 2seeds, sod, shrubs and other products of agricultural origin 3including the premises necessary to and used directly in 4agricultural production. Agricultural commodity also includes 5aquatic products, including any aquatic plants and animals or 6their by-products that are produced, grown, managed, harvested 7and marketed on an annual, semi-annual, biennial or short-term 8basis, in permitted aquaculture facilities.9    5. "Animal" means all vertebrate and invertebrate species 10including, but not limited to, man and other mammals, birds, 11fish, and shellfish.12    5.5. "Barrier mosquitocide" means a pesticide that is 13formulated to kill adult mosquitoes and that is applied so as 14to leave a residual mosquitocidal coating on natural or 15manmade surfaces. "Barrier mosquitocide" does not include a 16product that is exempt from registration under the Federal 17Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, or rules adopted 18pursuant to that Act.19    5.6. "Barrier mosquitocide treatment" means application of 20a barrier mosquitocide to a natural or manmade surface. 21    6. "Beneficial Insects" means those insects which during 22their life cycle are effective pollinators of plants, 23predators of pests or are otherwise beneficial.24    7. "Certified applicator".25        A. "Certified applicator" means any individual who is 26    certified under this Act to purchase, use, or supervise   SB0783 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    the use of pesticides which are classified for restricted 2    use.3        B. "Private applicator" means a certified applicator 4    who purchases, uses, or supervises the use of any 5    pesticide classified for restricted use, for the purpose 6    of producing any agricultural commodity on property owned, 7    rented, or otherwise controlled by him or his employer, or 8    applied to other property if done without compensation 9    other than trading of personal services between no more 10    than 2 producers of agricultural commodities.11        C. "Licensed Commercial Applicator" means a certified 12    applicator, whether or not he is a private applicator with 13    respect to some uses, who owns or manages a business that 14    is engaged in applying pesticides, whether classified for 15    general or restricted use, for hire. The term also applies 16    to a certified applicator who uses or supervises the use 17    of pesticides, whether classified for general or 18    restricted use, for any purpose or on property of others 19    excluding those specified by subparagraphs 7 (B), (D), (E) 20    of Section 4 of this Act.21        D. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" means a 22    certified applicator who uses or supervises the use of 23    pesticides classified for general or restricted use for 24    any purpose on property of an employer when such activity 25    is a requirement of the terms of employment and such 26    application of pesticides under this certification is   SB0783 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    limited to property under the control of the employer only 2    and includes, but is not limited to, the use or 3    supervision of the use of pesticides in a greenhouse 4    setting. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" also 5    includes a certified applicator who uses or supervises the 6    use of pesticides classified for general or restricted use 7    as an employee of a state agency, municipality, or other 8    duly constituted governmental agency or unit.9    8. "Defoliant" means any substance or combination of 10substances which cause leaves or foliage to drop from a plant 11with or without causing abscission.12    9. "Desiccant" means any substance or combination of 13substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying 14of plant tissue.15    10. "Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other 16than a firearm or equipment for application of pesticides when 17sold separately from pesticides, which is intended for 18trapping, repelling, destroying, or mitigating any pest, other 19than bacteria, virus, or other microorganisms on or living in 20man or other living animals.21    11. "Distribute" means offer or hold for sale, sell, 22barter, ship, deliver for shipment, receive and then deliver, 23or offer to deliver pesticides, within the State.24    12. "Environment" includes water, air, land, and all 25plants and animals including man, living therein and the 26interrelationships which exist among these.  SB0783 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    13. "Equipment" means any type of instruments and 2contrivances using motorized, mechanical or pressure power 3which is used to apply any pesticide, excluding pressurized 4hand-size household apparatus containing dilute ready to apply 5pesticide or used to apply household pesticides.6    14. "FIFRA" means the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and 7Rodenticide Act, as amended.8    15. "Fungi" means any non-chlorophyll bearing 9thallophytes, any non-chlorophyll bearing plant of a lower 10order than mosses or liverworts, as for example rust, smut, 11mildew, mold, yeast and bacteria, except those on or in living 12animals including man and those on or in processed foods, 13beverages or pharmaceuticals.14    16. "Household Substance" means any pesticide customarily 15produced and distributed for use by individuals in or about 16the household.17    17. "Imminent Hazard" means a situation which exists when 18continued use of a pesticide would likely result in 19unreasonable adverse effects on the environment or will 20involve unreasonable hazard to the survival of a species 21declared endangered by the U.S. Secretary of the Interior or 22to species declared to be protected by the Illinois Department 23of Natural Resources.24    18. "Inert Ingredient" means an ingredient which is not an 25active ingredient.26    19. "Ingredient Statement" means a statement of the name   SB0783 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1and percentage of each active ingredient together with the 2total percentage of inert ingredients in a pesticide and for 3pesticides containing arsenic in any form, the ingredient 4statement shall include percentage of total and water soluble 5arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. In the case of 6spray adjuvants the ingredient statement need contain only the 7names of the functioning agents and the total percent of those 8constituents ineffective as spray adjuvants.9    20. "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate 10animals generally having the body more or less obviously 11segmented for the most part belonging to the class Insects, 12comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as for example 13beetles, caterpillars, and flies. This definition encompasses 14other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless 15and usually have more than 6 legs as for example spiders, 16mites, ticks, centipedes, and millipedes.17    21. "Label" means the written, printed or graphic matter 18on or attached to the pesticide or device or any of its 19containers or wrappings.20    22. "Labeling" means the label and all other written, 21printed or graphic matter: (a) on the pesticide or device or 22any of its containers or wrappings, (b) accompanying the 23pesticide or device or referring to it in any other media used 24to disseminate information to the public, (c) to which 25reference is made to the pesticide or device except when 26references are made to current official publications of the U.   SB0783 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1S. Environmental Protection Agency, Departments of 2Agriculture, Health, Education and Welfare or other Federal 3Government institutions, the state experiment station or 4colleges of agriculture or other similar state institution 5authorized to conduct research in the field of pesticides.6    23. "Land" means all land and water area including 7airspace, and all plants, animals, structures, buildings, 8contrivances, and machinery appurtenant thereto or situated 9thereon, fixed or mobile, including any used for 10transportation.11    24. "Licensed Operator" means a person employed to apply 12pesticides to the lands of others under the direction of a 13"licensed commercial applicator" or a "licensed commercial 14not-for-hire applicator".15    25. "Nematode" means invertebrate animals of the phylum 16nemathelminthes and class nematoda, also referred to as nemas 17or eelworms, which are unsegmented roundworms with elongated 18fusiform or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle and 19inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts.20    26. "Permit" means a written statement issued by the 21Director or his authorized agent, authorizing certain acts of 22pesticide purchase or of pesticide use or application on an 23interim basis prior to normal certification, registration, or 24licensing.25    27. "Person" means any individual, partnership, 26association, fiduciary, corporation, or any organized group of   SB0783 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1persons whether incorporated or not.2    28. "Pest" means (a) any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, 3weed, or (b) any other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or 4animal life or virus, bacteria, or other microorganism, 5excluding virus, bacteria, or other microorganism on or in 6living animals including man, which the Director declares to 7be a pest.8    29. "Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of 9substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or 10mitigating any pest or any substance or mixture of substances 11intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.12    30. "Pesticide Dealer" means any person who distributes 13registered pesticides to the user.14    31. "Plant Regulator" means any substance or mixture of 15substances intended through physiological action to affect the 16rate of growth or maturation or otherwise alter the behavior 17of ornamental or crop plants or the produce thereof. This does 18not include substances which are not intended as plant 19nutrient trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant or seed 20inoculants or soil conditioners or amendments.21    32. "Protect Health and Environment" means to guard 22against any unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.23    33. "Registrant" means a person who has registered any 24pesticide pursuant to the provision of FIFRA and this Act.25    34. "Restricted Use Pesticide" means any pesticide with 26one or more of its uses classified as restricted by order of   SB0783 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1the Administrator of USEPA.2    35. "SLN Registration" means registration of a pesticide 3for use under conditions of special local need as defined by 4FIFRA.5    36. "State Restricted Pesticide Use" means any pesticide 6use which the Director determines, subsequent to public 7hearing, that an additional restriction for that use is needed 8to prevent unreasonable adverse effects.9    37. "Structural Pest" means any pests which attack and 10destroy buildings and other structures or which attack 11clothing, stored food, commodities stored at food 12manufacturing and processing facilities or manufactured and 13processed goods.14    38. "Unreasonable Adverse Effects on the Environment" 15means the unreasonable risk to the environment, including man, 16from the use of any pesticide, when taking into account 17accrued benefits of as well as the economic, social, and 18environmental costs of its use.19    39. "USEPA" means United States Environmental Protection 20Agency.21    40. "Use inconsistent with the label" means to use a 22pesticide in a manner not consistent with the label 23instruction, the definition adopted in FIFRA as interpreted by 24USEPA shall apply in Illinois.25    41. "Weed" means any plant growing in a place where it is 26not wanted.  SB0783 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    42. "Wildlife" means all living things, not human, 2domestic, or pests.3    43. "Bulk pesticide" means any registered pesticide which 4is transported or held in an individual container in undivided 5quantities of greater than 55 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 6100 pounds net dry weight.7    44. "Bulk repackaging" means the transfer of a registered 8pesticide from one bulk container (containing undivided 9quantities of greater than 100 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 10100 pounds net dry weight) to another bulk container 11(containing undivided quantities of greater than 100 U.S. 12gallons liquid measure or 100 pounds net dry weight) in an 13unaltered state in preparation for sale or distribution to 14another person.15    45. "Business" means any individual, partnership, 16corporation or association engaged in a business operation for 17the purpose of selling or distributing pesticides or providing 18the service of application of pesticides in this State.19    46. "Facility" means any building or structure and all 20real property contiguous thereto, including all equipment 21fixed thereon used for the operation of the business.22    47. "Chemigation" means the application of a pesticide 23through the systems or equipment employed for the primary 24purpose of irrigation of land and crops.25    48. "Use" means any activity covered by the pesticide 26label, including, but not limited to, application of   SB0783 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1pesticide, mixing and loading, storage of pesticides or 2pesticide containers, disposal of pesticides and pesticide 3containers and reentry into treated sites or areas.4    49. "Education course" means a course approved by the 5Department of Agriculture that may be used by a certified 6applicator, licensed operator, or registered pesticide dealer 7to meet renewal requirements under the Act.8    50. "License transfer" means the transfer of an existing 9license or certification by the Department from one certified 10applicator or operator to another certified applicator or 11operator for the period of time remaining on the license 12before renewal. 13(Source: P.A. 102-555, eff. 1-1-22; 102-916, eff. 1-1-23; 14103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 15    (415 ILCS 60/6)  (from Ch. 5, par. 806)16    Sec. 6. Registration. 17    1. Every pesticide which is distributed, sold, offered for 18sale within this State, delivered for transportation or 19transported in interstate commerce or between points within 20the State through any point outside the State, shall be 21registered with the Director or his designated agent, subject 22to provisions of this Act. Such registration shall be for a 23period determined under item 1.5 of this Section and shall 24expire on December 31st. Registration is not required if a 25pesticide is shipped from one plant or warehouse to another   SB0783 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1plant or warehouse by the same person and is used solely at 2such plant or warehouse as a constituent part to make a 3pesticide which is registered under provisions of this Act and 4FIFRA.5    1.5. In order to stagger product registrations, the 6Department shall, for the 2011 registration year, register 7half of the applicants and their products for one year and the 8other half for 2 years. Thereafter, a business registration 9and product registration shall be for 2 years. 10    2. Registration applicant shall file a statement with the 11Director which shall include:12        A. The name and address of the applicant and the name 13    and address of the person whose name will appear on the 14    label if different from the applicant's.15        B. The name of the pesticide.16        C. A copy of the labeling accompanying the pesticide 17    under customary conditions of distribution, sale and use, 18    including ingredient statement, direction for use, use 19    classification, and precautionary or warning statements.20    3. The Director may require the submission of complete 21formula data.22    4. The Director may require a full description of tests 23made and the results thereof, upon which the claims are based, 24for any pesticide not registered pursuant to FIFRA, or on any 25pesticide under consideration to be classified for restricted 26use.  SB0783 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1        A. The Director will not consider data he required of 2    the initial registrant of a pesticide in support of 3    another applicants' registration unless the subsequent 4    applicant has obtained written permission to use such 5    data.6        B. In the case of renewal registration, the Director 7    may accept a statement only with respect to information 8    which is different from that furnished previously.9    5. The Director may prescribe other requirements to 10support a pesticide registration by regulation.11    6. For the years preceding the year 2004, any registrant 12desiring to register a pesticide product at any time during 13one year shall pay the annual registration fee of $100 per 14product registered for that applicant. For the years 2004 15through 2010, the annual product registration fee is $200 per 16product. For the years 2011 through 2023, the product 17registration fee shall be $600 per product per 2-year 18registration period and shall be paid at the time of 19registration. For the years 2024 through 2025 and thereafter, 20the product registration fee shall be $800 per product per 212-year registration period and shall be paid at the time of 22registration. For the year 2026 and for each year thereafter, 23the product registration fee shall be $850 per product per 242-year registration period and shall be paid at the time of 25registration. 26    In addition, for the years preceding the year 2004 any   SB0783 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1business registering a pesticide product at any time during 2one year shall pay the annual business registration fee of 3$250. For the years 2004 through 2010, the annual business 4registration fee shall be $400. For the years 2011 through 52023, the business registration fee shall be $800 per 2-year 6registration period and shall be paid at the time of 7registration. For the years 2024 through 2025 and thereafter, 8the business registration fee shall be $1000 per 2-year 9registration period and shall be paid at the time of 10registration. For the year 2026 and for each year thereafter, 11the business registration fee shall be $1,050 per 2-year 12registration period and shall be paid at the time of 13registration. Each legal entity of the business shall pay the 14business registration fee.15    For the years preceding the year 2004, any applicant 16requesting an experimental use permit shall pay the annual fee 17of $100 per permit and all special local need pesticide 18registration applicants shall pay an annual fee of $100 per 19product. For the years 2004 through 2010, the annual 20experimental use permit fee and special local need pesticide 21registration fee is $200 per permit. For the years 2011 and 22thereafter, the annual experimental use permit and special 23local need pesticide registration fee shall be $300 per 24product. Subsequent SLN registrations for a pesticide already 25registered shall be exempted from the registration fee.26        A. All registration accepted and approved by the   SB0783 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    Director shall expire on the 31st day of December in any 2    one year unless cancelled. Registration for a special 3    local need may be granted for a specific period of time 4    with the approval date and expiration date specified.5        B. If a registration for special local need granted by 6    the Director does not receive approval of the 7    Administrator of USEPA, the registration shall expire on 8    the date of the Administrator's disapproval.9    7. Registrations approved and accepted by the Director and 10in effect on the 31st day of December, for which renewal 11application is made, shall continue in full force and effect 12until the Director notifies the registrant that the renewal 13has been approved and accepted or the registration is denied 14under this Act. Renewal registration forms will be provided to 15applicants by the Director.16    8. If the renewal of a pesticide registration is not filed 17within 30 days of the date of expiration, a penalty late 18registration assessment of $100 per product shall apply in 19addition to the regular product registration fee. The late 20registration assessment shall not apply if the applicant 21furnishes an affidavit certifying that no unregulated 22pesticide was distributed or sold during the period of 23registration. The late assessment is not a bar to prosecution 24for doing business without proper registry.25    9. The Director may prescribe by regulation to allow 26pesticide use for a special local need, pursuant to FIFRA.   SB0783 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    10. The Director may prescribe by regulation the 2provisions for and requirements of registering a pesticide 3intended for experimental use.4    11. The Director shall not make any lack of essentiality a 5criterion for denial of registration of any pesticide. Where 2 6pesticides meet the requirements, one should not be registered 7in preference to the other.8    12. It shall be the duty of the pesticide registrant to 9properly dispose of any pesticide the registration of which 10has been suspended, revoked or cancelled or which is otherwise 11not properly registered in the State.12(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (415 ILCS 60/10)  (from Ch. 5, par. 810)14    Sec. 10. Commercial applicator license. No commercial 15applicator shall use or supervise the use of any pesticide 16without a commercial license issued by the Director. For the 17years preceding the year 2001, the Director shall require an 18annual fee for commercial applicator license of $35. For the 19years 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, and 2006, the annual fee 20for a commercial applicator license is $45. For the years 2007 21through 2017, the annual fee for a commercial applicator 22license is $60. For the years 2018 through 2023, the fee for a 23multi-year commercial applicator license is $180. For the 24years 2024 through 2025 and thereafter, the fee for a 25multi-year commercial applicator license is $240. For the year   SB0783 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b12026 and for each year thereafter, the fee for a multi-year 2commercial applicator license is $300 The late application fee 3for a commercial applicator license shall be $20 in addition 4to the normal license fee. A commercial applicator shall be 5assessed a fee of $25 $10 for a duplicate license or license 6transfer.7    1. Application for the commercial applicator license shall 8be made in writing on designated forms available from the 9Director. Each application shall contain information regarding 10the applicants qualifications, nature of the proposed 11operation, classification of license being sought, and shall 12include the following:13        A. The full name of the applicant.14        B. The address of the applicant.15        C. Any necessary information prescribed by the 16    Director on the designated application form.17    2. An applicant for a license shall demonstrate competence 18and knowledge regarding pesticide use in accordance with 19Section 9 of this Act.20    3. A licensed commercial applicator must provide to the 21Director at the time of original licensing and must maintain 22throughout the licensure period evidence of financial 23responsibility protecting persons who may suffer personal 24injury or property damage or both as a result of the pesticide 25operation of the applicant in either of the following manners:26        A. Evidence of responsibility may be provided in the   SB0783 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    form of a surety bond for each licensed commercial 2    applicator naming the licensed commercial applicator as 3    principal of the bond. The amount of the bond shall be not 4    less than $50,000 per year. It is permissible to provide 5    two bonds; one for $25,000 for bodily injury liability and 6    the second for $25,000 for property damage liability. The 7    bond or bonds shall be made payable to the Director of 8    Agriculture, State of Illinois, for the benefit of the 9    injured party and shall be conditioned upon compliance 10    with the provisions of this Act by the principal, his or 11    her officers, representatives and employees; or12        B. Evidence of responsibility may be provided in the 13    form of a certificate of liability insurance providing 14    coverage for each licensed commercial applicator or 15    licensed entity in the amount of not less than $50,000 per 16    person, $100,000 per occurrence bodily injury liability 17    coverage, with an annual aggregate of not less than 18    $500,000, and $50,000 per occurrence property damage 19    liability, with an annual aggregate of not less than 20    $50,000; or, in lieu thereof, a combined single limit of 21    not less than $100,000 bodily injury and property damage 22    liability combined, with an annual aggregate of not less 23    than $500,000.24    4. Every insurance policy or bond shall contain a 25provision that it will not be cancelled or reduced by the 26principal or insurance company, except upon 30 days prior   SB0783 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1notice in writing to the Director of the Department at the 2Springfield, Illinois office and the principal insured. A 3reduction or cancellation of policy shall not affect the 4liability accrued or which may accrue under such policy before 5the expiration of the 30 days. The notice shall contain the 6termination date. Upon said reduction or cancellation, the 7Director shall immediately notify the licensee that his or her 8license will be suspended and the effective date until the 9minimum bond or liability insurance requirements are met by 10the licensee for the current license period.11    5. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to relieve any 12person from liability for any damage to persons or property 13caused by use of pesticides even though such use conforms to 14label instructions and pertinent rules and regulations of this 15State.16    6. The Director may renew any applicant's license in the 17classifications for which such applicant is licensed, subject 18to requalification requirements imposed by the Director. 19Requalification standards shall be prescribed by regulations 20adopted pursuant to this Act and are required to ensure that 21the licensed commercial applicator meets the requirements of 22changing technology and to assure a continued level of 23competence and ability.24    7. The Director may limit the license of an applicant to 25allow only the use of certain pesticides in a delimited 26geographic area, or to the use of certain application   SB0783 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1techniques or equipment. If a license is not issued as applied 2for, the Director shall inform the applicant in writing of the 3reasons and extend an opportunity for the applicant to 4complete the requirements for the license desired.5    8. For the purpose of uniformity, the Director may enter 6into agreements for accepting standards of qualification of 7other states as a basis for licensing commercial applicators.8(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    (415 ILCS 60/11)  (from Ch. 5, par. 811)10    Sec. 11. Certified pesticide applicators and private 11applicators. No person shall use or supervise the use of 12pesticides classified for restricted use without a license 13issued by the Director. Persons licensed or desiring to be 14licensed as certified pesticide applicators shall comply with 15the certification requirements as set forth in Section 9 of 16this Act in order to protect public health and the 17environment, including injury to the applicator or other 18persons using these pesticides.19    An applicant for certification as a private pesticide 20applicator shall meet qualification requirements prescribed by 21regulation. Certification shall be valid for the calendar year 22in which the certification is issued plus 2 additional 23calendar years, expiring on December 31st. The application for 24certification shall be made in writing to the Director, on 25forms available from the Director or the local county   SB0783 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1agricultural extension adviser's office and be accompanied by 2payment of a $10 license fee in the years preceding the year 32001. During the years 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, and 2006, 4the private pesticide applicator license fee shall be $15. 5During the years 2007 through 2010, the private pesticide 6applicator license fee shall be $20. For the years 2011 7through 2023, the private pesticide applicator license fee 8shall be $30. For the years 2024 through 2025 and thereafter, 9the private pesticide applicator license fee shall be $60. For 10the year 2026 and for each year thereafter, the private 11pesticide applicator license fee shall be $90. A private 12pesticide applicator shall be assessed a fee of $5 for a 13duplicate license or license transfer. Such application shall 14include:15        A. The full name of the applicant.16        B. The mailing address of the applicant.17        C. The documents required as evidence of competence 18    and knowledge regarding the use of pesticides.19    Certification, as a private pesticide applicator, issued 20by the Director shall be valid for a period prescribed by 21regulation. The Director shall develop regulatory standards to 22ensure that certified private pesticide applicators continue 23to meet the requirements of a changing technology and assure a 24continued level of competence and ability.25(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.)   SB0783 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    (415 ILCS 60/11.1)  (from Ch. 5, par. 811.1)2    Sec. 11.1. Commercial not-for-hire license. No commercial 3not-for-hire applicator shall use or supervise the use of any 4pesticide without a license issued by the Director. For the 5years 2011 through 2017, the commercial not-for-hire pesticide 6applicator license fee shall be $20. For the years 2018 7through 2023, the fee for a multi-year commercial not-for-hire 8pesticide applicator license is $60. For the years 2024 9through 2025 and thereafter, the fee for a multi-year 10commercial not-for-hire pesticide applicator license is $120. 11For the year 2026 and for each year thereafter, the fee for a 12multi-year commercial not-for-hire pesticide applicator 13license is $180 The late application fee for a public or 14commercial not-for-hire applicator license shall be $20 in 15addition to the normal license fees. A commercial not-for-hire 16applicator shall be assessed a fee of $20 $10 for a duplicate 17license or license transfer.18    1. Application for certification as a commercial 19not-for-hire pesticide applicator shall be made in writing on 20designated forms available from the Director. Each application 21shall contain information regarding the qualifications of the 22applicant, classification of certification being sought, and 23shall include the following:24        A. The full name of the applicant.25        B. The name of the applicant's employer.26        C. The address at the applicant's place of employment.  SB0783 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1        D. Any other information prescribed by the Director on 2    the designated form.3    2. The Director shall not issue a certification to a 4commercial not-for-hire pesticide applicator until the 5individual identified has demonstrated his competence and 6knowledge regarding pesticide use in accordance with Section 9 7of this Act.8    3. The Director shall not renew a certification as a 9commercial not-for-hire pesticide applicator until the 10applicant reestablishes his qualifications in accordance with 11Section 9 of this Act or has met other requirements imposed by 12regulation in order to ensure that the applicant meets the 13requirements of changing technology and to assure a continued 14level of competence and ability.15    4. (Blank).16    5. (Blank).17    6. (Blank).18    7. Persons applying general use pesticides, approved by 19the Inter-Agency Committee on the Use of Pesticides, to scrap 20tires for the control of mosquitoes shall be exempt from the 21license requirements of this Section.22(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.) 23    (415 ILCS 60/11.5 new)24    Sec. 11.5. Operator permit and certified applicator and 25dealer license renewal.   SB0783 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1    1. Subject to appropriation, sufficient available 2education courses, and successful procurement and 3implementation of any requisite tracking software, certified 4applicators, licensed operators, or registered pesticide 5dealers may elect to take education courses or an examination 6to meet the requirements for the renewal of certifications, 7licenses, permits, or registrations under this Act.8    2. Before renewing a certification, license, permit, or 9registration under this Act, a certified applicator, licensed 10operator, or registered pesticide dealer must demonstrate 11competence and ability in the use of pesticides and an 12understanding of the requirements of this Act by either (i) 13successfully completing an examination administered by the 14Department or its designee every 3 years or (ii) successfully 15completing 15 hours of Department-approved education courses 16every 3 years.17    3. In approving education courses and the providers of 18education courses, the Department may consult with other 19agencies and non-State entities with interests affected by the 20Act. However, the Department shall have ultimate 21decision-making authority with respect to the approval of 22education courses.23        A. To be approved by the Department, an education 24    course must be offered by an entity with significant 25    familiarity and understanding of the Act and with 26    pesticide application in Illinois.  SB0783 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1        B. Presentations or classes advocating for specific 2    products, services, or the sale or use of specific 3    products or services shall not be approved. This 4    restriction shall not apply to courses that are offered by 5    a person subject to this Section and intended to cover the 6    proper use of the person's product, so long as the course 7    provider does not advocate for or attempt to persuade the 8    attendee to use that specific product.9    4. Any education course used to meet the requirements for 10certification, license, permit, or registration renewal shall 11include all topics, laws, and rules that are contained in the 12examination for that certification, license, permit, or 13registration as provided for in the Department's 14administrative rules.15    5. Any person choosing to meet renewal requirements by 16attending education courses under this Section shall be 17responsible for tracking the number of hours of education 18courses completed. Failure to attend the required number of 19hours of education courses will result in the person having to 20take the examination.21    6. The Department may adopt rules to implement and 22administer this Section, including administrative rules 23related to education courses and their content, provider 24restrictions and requirements, and any related topic that the 25Department deems necessary or appropriate to implement and 26maintain the education course program described in this   SB0783 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1Section. 2    (415 ILCS 60/12)  (from Ch. 5, par. 812)3    Sec. 12. Licensed operator. No pesticide operator shall 4use any pesticides without a pesticide operator license issued 5by the Director.6    1. Application for an operator license shall be made in 7writing on designated forms available from the Director. Each 8application shall contain information regarding the nature of 9applicants pesticide use, his qualifications, and such other 10facts as prescribed on the form. The application shall also 11include the following:12        A. The full name of applicant.13        B. The address of the applicant.14        C. The name of and license/certification number of the 15    pesticide applicator under whom the applicant will work.16    2. The Director shall not issue a pesticide operator 17license until the individual identified has demonstrated his 18competence and knowledge regarding pesticide use in accordance 19with Section 9 of this Act.20    3. The Director shall not issue an operator license to any 21person who is unable to provide the name and 22license/certification number of an applicator under whom the 23operator will work.24    4. For the years preceding the year 2001, a licensed 25commercial operator working for or under the supervision of a   SB0783 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1certified licensed commercial pesticide applicator shall pay 2an annual fee of $25. For the years 2001, 2002, and 2003, the 3annual fee for a commercial operator license is $30. For the 4years 2004, 2005, and 2006, the annual fee for a commercial 5operator license is $35. For the years 2007 through 2017, the 6annual fee for a commercial operator license is $40. For the 7years 2018 through 2023, the fee for a multi-year commercial 8operator license is $120. For the years 2024 through 2025 and 9thereafter, the fee for a multi-year commercial operator 10license is $180. For the year 2026 and for each year 11thereafter, the fee for a multi-year commercial operator 12license is $240 The late application fee for an operator 13license shall be $20 in addition to the normal license fee. A 14licensed operator shall be assessed a fee of $20 $10 for a 15duplicate license or license transfer.16    5. For the years 2011 through 2017, the commercial 17not-for-hire pesticide operator license fee shall be $15. For 18the years 2018 through 2023, the fee for a multi-year 19commercial not-for-hire pesticide operator license is $45. For 20the years 2024 through 2025 and thereafter, the fee for a 21multi-year commercial not-for-hire pesticide operator license 22is $90. For the year 2026 and for each year thereafter, the fee 23for a multi-year commercial not-for-hire-pesticide operator 24license is $150 The late application fee for a commercial 25not-for-hire operator license shall be $20 in addition to the 26normal license fee. A commercial not-for-hire operator shall   SB0783 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1be assessed a fee of $15 $10 for a duplicate license.2(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (415 ILCS 60/13)  (from Ch. 5, par. 813)4    Sec. 13. Pesticide dealers. Any pesticide dealer who sells 5Restricted Use pesticides shall be registered with the 6Department on forms provided by the Director. Beginning July 71, 2005, any pesticide dealer that sells non-restricted use 8pesticides for use in the production of an agricultural 9commodity in containers with a capacity of 2.5 gallons or 10greater or 10 pounds or greater must also register with the 11Department on forms provided by the Director. Through 2017, 12registration shall consist of passing a required examination 13and payment of a $100 registration fee. For the years 2018 14through 2023, the pesticide dealer registration fee for a 15multi-year registration period is $300. For the years 2024 16through 2025 and thereafter, the pesticide dealer registration 17fee for a multi-year registration period is $350. For the year 182026 and for each year thereafter, the pesticide dealer 19registration fee for a multi-year registration period is $360 20The late application fee for a pesticide dealer registration 21shall be $20 in addition to the normal pesticide dealer 22registration fee. A pesticide dealer shall be assessed a fee 23of $30 $10 for a duplicate registration or license transfer.24    Dealers who hold a Structural Pest Control license with 25the Illinois Department of Public Health or a Commercial   SB0783 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07111 BDA 17148 b1Applicator's license with the Illinois Department of 2Agriculture are exempt from the registration fee but must 3register with the Department.4    Each place of business which sells restricted use 5pesticides or non-restricted pesticides for use in the 6production of an agricultural commodity in containers with a 7capacity of 2.5 gallons or greater or 10 pounds or greater 8shall be considered a separate entity for the purpose of 9registration.10    Registration as a pesticide dealer shall expire on 11December 31 of the year in which it is to expire. Pesticide 12dealers shall be certified in accordance with Section 9 of 13this Act.14    The Director may prescribe, by rule, requirements for the 15registration and testing of any pesticide dealer selling other 16than restricted use pesticides and such rules shall include 17the establishment of a registration fee in an amount not to 18exceed the pesticide dealer registration fee.19    The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the 20registration of any person who fails to file a return, or to 21pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed return, or 22to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty, or interest, as 23required by any tax Act administered by the Illinois 24Department of Revenue, until such time as the requirements of 25any such tax Act are satisfied.26(Source: P.A. 103-441, eff. 1-1-24.)